Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.300

Criminal penalties.

(1) A person that intentionally makes a false statement, misrepresentation, or false certification in a record filed or required to be maintained under this chapter or that intentionally makes a false entry or omits a material entry in that record is guilty of a class C felony under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2) A person that knowingly engages in an activity for which a license is required under this chapter without being licensed under this chapter and who receives more than five hundred dollars in compensation within a thirty-day period from this activity is guilty of a gross misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) A person that knowingly engages in an activity for which a license is required under this chapter without being licensed under this chapter and who receives no more than five hundred dollars in compensation within a thirty-day period from this activity is guilty of a misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2003 c 287 s 32.]